Utah statutes.
73-3b-204.   Application for a recovery permit -- Required information.
(1)  A person may file a recovery permit application with a recharge permit
application.
(2)  The application for obtaining a recovery permit shall include the
following information:
(a)  the name and mailing address of the applicant;
(b)  a legal description of the location of the existing well or proposed new
well from which the applicant intends to recover artificially recharged water;
(c)  a written consent from the owner of the recharge permit, if the applicant
does not hold the recharge permit;
(d)  the name and mailing address of the owner of the land from which the
applicant proposes to recover artificially recharged water;
(e)  the name or description of the artificially recharged groundwater aquifer
which is the source of supply;
(f)  the purpose for which the artificially recharged water will be recovered;
(g)  the depth and diameter of the existing well or proposed new well;
(h)  a legal description of the area where the artificially recharged water is
proposed to be used;
(i)  the design pumping capacity of the existing well or proposed new well;
and
(j)  any other information including maps, drawings, and data that the state
engineer requires.
(3) (a)  A filing fee must be submitted with the application.
(b)  The state engineer shall establish the filing fee in accordance with
Section 63J-1-504.
